Hawaii statutes.
§806-23 Misjoinder. No indictment
shall be quashed, set aside, or dismissed, nor shall any demurrer thereto be
sustained for misjoinder of parties defendant or for misjoinder of offenses
charged; and if either defect exists the court may sever the indictment
containing it into separate indictments or into separate counts as shall be
proper. [L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4047; RL 1935, §5506; RL 1945,
§10808; RL 1955, §258-18; HRS §711-23; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Relief from prejudicial joinder, see HRPP rule 14.

Motion in lieu of demurrer, see HRPP rule 12(a).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next